Maine, session 132, LD1169.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 26 MRSA §850-H, sub-§9 is enacted to read:
9. Refund of premiums. An employer with a private plan that was in place on or
before January 1, 2025 that is approved by the department pursuant to this section is entitled
to a refund of premiums paid pursuant to section 850-F in accordance with this subsection.
A. As used in this subsection, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following
terms have the following meanings.
(1) "Approved employer" means an employer whose private plan was approved by
the department pursuant to this section.
(2) "Premium" means the payroll premiums submitted pursuant to section 850-F,
subsection 2.
B. An approved employer, using a form prepared by the administrator, shall submit a
request for a refund of the premiums paid by the approved employer, specifying the
total amount of the premiums paid by the employer prior to approval of the plan.
C. The administrator, upon receipt of the form from an approved employer, shall verify
the amount of the refund requested and, within 90 days of receipt of the request, refund
the approved employer the total of premiums paid, plus interest to the date of payment
to the approved employer. The rate of interest must be the same as calculated pursuant
to Title 36, section 186.
Sec. 2. Form and refund information. The Department of Labor shall develop
and make available on its publicly accessible website a refund request form and information
regarding the availability of a refund for employers whose private plan meets the
requirements of and is approved by the department as a substitute plan under the Maine
Revised Statutes, Title 26, section 850-H. The department shall meet the requirements of
this section no later than 45 days following the effective date of this Act.